District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.19

Repealed

Involuntary dissolution — Suit by United States Attorney.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1319, ch. 854, § 786
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, §§ 1, 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 168(d)(2), 169(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.19.
1981 Ed., § 29-419.
1973 Ed., § 29-719.